Washington statutes.
RCW 33.48.290

RCW 33.48.150 through 33.48.280 inapplicable to foreign associations.

RCW 33.48.150 through 33.48.280 do not apply to foreign associations doing business in this state pursuant to the provisions of chapter 33.32 RCW.

[ 1982 c 3 s 111; 1973 c 130 s 19.]

NOTES:

Severability—1982 c 3: See note following RCW 33.04.002.

Severability—1973 c 130: See note following RCW 33.24.350.